Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-320
Nebraska Arts Council; duties.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall determine the amount of money to be made available for the purchase of art for each project subject to section 82-319. The selection of, commissioning of artists for, reviewing of design, execution and placement of, and the acceptance of works of art for each project shall be the responsibility of the Nebraska Arts Council in consultation with the committee established pursuant to section 82-321.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 4.